Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB582.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7813(c)(2) and 7823(c)(2) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7813. Award of grants.* * *(c) Time for filing application and department action.--* * *(2) (i) Fire companies seeking grants under this chapter shall submit completed applications to the commissioner and the municipalities where the fire companies are located.(ii) Except as provided under subparagraph (iii):(A) The application period shall remain open for 123456789101112131415161718 45 days each year.(B) The agency shall act to approve or disapprove applications within 60 days of the application submission deadline each year.(C) Applications which have not been approved or disapproved by the commissioner within 60 days after the close of the application period each year shall be deemed approved.(iii) Upon request by a fire company, the commissioner shall extend the period to submit required reports for 15 additional days. The fire company does not have to have demonstrated a hardship or undue burden. A fire company may only make a request under this subparagraph once every three years.* * *§ 7823. Award of grants.* * *(c) Time for filing application and department action.--* * *(2) (i) EMS companies seeking grants under this chapter shall submit completed applications to the commissioner. [The](ii) Except as provided under subparagraph (iii):(A) The application period shall remain open for 45 days each year.(B) The commissioner shall act to approve or disapprove applications within 60 days of the application submission deadline each year.(C) Applications which have not been approved or disapproved by the commissioner within 60 days after 20250SB0582PN0589 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the close of the application period each year shall be deemed approved.(iii) Upon request by an EMS company, the commissioner shall extend the period to submit required reports for 15 additional days. The EMS company does not have to have demonstrated a hardship or undue burden. An EMS company may only make a request under this subparagraph once every three years.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0582PN0589 - 3 - 123456789